Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 19
NURSING FACULTY FELLOWSHIP PROGRAM

23-19-101 to 23-19-104. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article repealed, (HB 11-1281), ch. 180, p. 688, § 10, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2006 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2011. For the text of this article prior to 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes.